Hawaii, session 2026, HB812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 103D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§103D-     Purchases of local produce; specifications.  (a) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, any contract for the purchase of local produce having a value of more than $25,000 may be for a term of at least five years; provided that the contract shall contain a price adjustment clause to either increase or decrease the value. (b) For the purposes of this section, "local produce" means all fruits, vegetables, nuts, coffee, eggs, poultry and poultry products, livestock and livestock products, milk and milk products, aquacultural and maricultural products, and horticultural products one hundred per cent grown, raised, and harvested in Hawaii." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.